Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska41-202
Hotel, defined.

Hotel shall mean every building or other structure kept, used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a place where sleeping and other accommodations are offered for pay, principally to transient guests, in which ten or more persons are accommodated or five or more rooms are used principally for the accommodation of transient guests, with or without one or more dining rooms or cafes where meals or lunches are served to such guests, together with any buildings in connection therewith.

Laws 1982, LB 547, § 2.